Utah statutes.
53-8-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Division" means the Utah Highway Patrol Division created in Section 53-8-103.

(2)  "Highway Patrol" means the Highway Patrol troopers employed under Section 53-8-104.

(3)  "Superintendent" means the director of the division, appointed under Section 53-8-103.



Enacted by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

